California statutes. Education Code
The Department of Justice may participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) in lieu of submitting fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to meet the requirements of this section relating to firearms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 746, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

72330.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the safety of students, staff, and the public on or near California’s community colleges, by providing community college security officers with training that will enable them to deal with the increasingly diverse and dangerous situations they encounter.

(b) (1) Every school security officer employed by a community college district shall complete the latest course of training developed by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Section 7583.45
 of the Business and Professions Code. If a community college security officer subject to the requirements of this subdivision is required to carry a firearm while employed, that security officer shall additionally satisfy the training requirements of Section 832 of the Penal Code.

(2) A community college district shall provide the training required pursuant to this subdivision to all school security officers who are employees of the community college district. A community college district shall provide the training during the employee’s regular work hours, unless otherwise negotiated and mutually agreed upon with the employee’s exclusive representative.

(3) This subdivision does not require a community college district to provide training to security guards who are not employees
 of the community college district, including security guards who work on the property of the community college district pursuant to a contract with a private licensed security agency. A community college district that contracts for security services shall comply with the requirements of Section 88003.1.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to a school security officer employed by a community college district who works 20 or fewer hours per week as a school security officer until July 1, 2021.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “security officer” means any person primarily employed or assigned pursuant to subdivision (b) to provide security services as a watchperson, security guard, or patrolperson on or about premises owned or operated by the community college district to protect persons
 or property or to prevent the theft or unlawful taking of community college district property of any kind or to report any unlawful activity to the community college district and local law enforcement.

(d) (1) A security officer shall not be employed and shall not continue to be employed by a community college district until both of the following conditions have been met:

(A) (i) The applicant or employee has submitted to the community college district two copies of their fingerprints on forms or electronically, as prescribed by the Department of Justice. The community college district shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Justice, which shall submit one copy of the fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of
 Investigation.

(ii) An applicant or employee who holds a permanent registration with the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs as a security guard need only submit one copy of their fingerprints, which copy shall be submitted to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(iii) An applicant or employee who is registered by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs, and who holds a firearms qualification card as specified in Section 7583.22 of the Business and Professions Code, is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) The applicant or employee has been determined not to be a person legally prohibited from
 employment by the community college and has been determined by the Department of Justice not to be a person prohibited from possessing a firearm if the applicant is required to carry a firearm.

(2) The Department of Justice may participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) in lieu of submitting fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to meet the requirements of this subdivision relating to firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 475, Sec. 3.   (SB 390)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

72331.

Every member of a community college police department shall be supplied with, and authorized to wear, a badge bearing the words “Community College Police”, prefaced by the name of the district, and shall be issued a suitable identification card bearing his or her physical description, photograph, and authority for peace officer status, and such other identification data as may be required by local law enforcement agencies, countersigned by the chief administrative officer of the district. The governing board may direct the wearing of a distinctive uniform and shall prescribe such a uniform. The governing board shall pay for the required uniforms, equipment, identification cards, and badges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

72332.

Any vehicle, when operated in the performance of his or her duties by any member of the police department, is an authorized emergency vehicle and may be equipped and operated as such as provided by the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Officers and Agents [72400. - 72423.]

72400.

The governing board of each community college district shall fix and prescribe the duties to be performed by all persons in community college service in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

72401.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any person may be permitted by the governing board of any community college district to serve as a nonteaching volunteer aide under the immediate supervision and direction of the academic personnel of the district to perform noninstructional work that serves to assist the academic personnel in the performance of teaching and administrative responsibilities. A nonteaching volunteer aide shall not be an employee of the district, and shall serve without compensation of any type or other benefits accorded to employees of the district, except as provided in Section 3364.5 of the Labor Code.

(b) No district may abolish any of its classified positions and utilize volunteer aides, as authorized herein, in lieu of classified employees who are laid off as a result of the abolition of a position. A district shall not refuse to employ a person in a vacant classified position and use volunteer aides in lieu thereof.

(c) Volunteer aides may be used to enhance a district’s educational program, but not to displace classified employees, nor to allow districts to utilize volunteers in lieu of normal employee requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 4.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

72403.

The governing board of each community college district shall annually at its initial meeting select one of its members to serve as its representative for purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3. The representative selected pursuant to this section shall have one vote for each member to be elected to the county committee pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1095, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

72411.

(a) Every educational administrator shall be employed, and all other administrators may be employed, by the governing board of the district by an appointment or contract of up to four years in duration. The governing board of a community college district, with the consent of the administrator concerned, may at any time terminate, effective on the next succeeding first day of July, the term of employment of, and any contract of employment with, the administrator of the district, and reemploy the administrator, on any terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon by the board and the administrator, for a new term to commence on the effective date of the termination of the existing term of employment. 

(b) If the governing board of a district determines that an administrator is not to be reemployed by appointment or contract in his or her administrative position upon the expiration of his or her appointment or contract, the administrator shall be given written notice of this determination by the governing board. For an administrator employed by appointment or contract, the term of which is longer than one year, the notice shall be given at least six months in advance of the expiration of the appointment or contract unless the contract or appointment provides otherwise. For every other administrator, notice that the administrator may not be reemployed by appointment or contract in his or her administrative position for the following college year shall be given on or before March 15. 

(c) If the governing board fails to reemploy an administrator by appointment or contract in his or her administrative position and the written notice provided for in this section has not been given, the administrator shall, unless the existing appointment or contract provides otherwise, be deemed to be reemployed for a term of the same duration as the one completed with all other terms and conditions remaining unchanged. 

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply to any administrator who holds a position that is funded for less than a college year, is assigned to an acting position whose continuing right to hold the position depends on being selected for the position on a regular basis, is terminated pursuant to Section 87743, 88017, or 88127, or is dismissed for cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 5.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

72411.5.

In the absence of an express appointment or contract as provided in Section 72411, every administrator shall serve in his or her administrative assignment at the pleasure of the governing board. The dismissal of, and imposition of penalties for cause on, an administrator employed by appointment or contract pursuant to Section 72411 shall, if the administrator does not have tenure as a faculty member, be in accordance with the terms of the appointment or contract of employment. If the administrator has tenure as a faculty member, the dismissal of, and imposition of penalties for cause on, the administrator shall be in accordance with the provisions applicable to faculty members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

72423.

The governing board of each community college district shall provide for the payment of the travel expenses of any representatives of the board when performing services directed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 345.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Liabilities, Insurance, and Corrupt Practices [72500. - 72533.]



  ARTICLE 1. Liabilities [72500. - 72508.]

72500.

The governing board of any community college district is liable in the name of the district for all debts and contracts, including the salary due any instructor not made in excess of the moneys accruing to the district and usable for the purposes of the debts and contracts during the college year for which the debts and contracts are made. The district shall not be liable for debts and contracts made in violation of this section.

For the purposes of this section, moneys transferred to the funds of a newly organized district pursuant to Section 85223 are deemed district moneys accruing to the district and usable for the purposes of contracts made for the college year preceding the date the district became effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 346.)
-------------------------------------------

72502.

All claims for money or damages against a district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

72506.

(a) Action taken by any governing board of a community college district to procure insurance shall be governed by the authority of Sections 70902 and 75003 and, where applicable, by Sections 989 to 991.2, inclusive, of the Government Code. However, the governing board of any community college district shall ensure against all of the following:

(1) The liability, other than a liability which may be insured against under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, of the district for damages for death, injury to person, or damage or loss of property.

(2) The personal liability of the members of the board and of the officers and employees of the district for damages for death, injury to a
 person, or damage or loss of property caused by the negligent act or omission of the member, officer, or employee when acting within the scope of their office or employment.

(b) The insurance may be written by any insurance company authorized to transact the business of insurance in the state, or by a nonadmitted insurer to the extent, and subject to the conditions, prescribed by Section 1763 of the Insurance Code.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the governing board of any community college district may provide for persons authorized by the governing board to perform volunteer services for the district, insurance coverage which is the same as, or comparable to, that provided for employees of the district including coverage under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(d) The governing board of a community college district may provide protection from its own funds for the purpose of covering the liability of the district, its officers, agents, and employees, in lieu of carrying insurance in insurance companies, as provided in this section. The governing board may also provide protection against the liability partly by means of its own funds and partly by means of insurance written by insurance companies, as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 84.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

72507.

Notwithstanding the requirement to provide for indemnity bonds pursuant to Section 85266.5, the governing board of a community college district may, in lieu thereof, insure against all losses caused by an employee or an officer of a community college district if the insurance gives the same or greater protection to the community college district that a bond would provide in indemnifying the community college districts against any loss caused by the employee or officer of the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

72508.

The governing board of any community college district maintaining a course of automobile driver training shall advise the parents or guardians or persons having custody of minors of the district participating in automobile driver training courses under the jurisdiction of, or sponsored or controlled by, the district, who have signed the statement required by Section 12650 of the Vehicle Code or an application for a driver’s license under Section 17701 of the Vehicle Code, of each of the following:

(a) Any civil liability of the minor which will be imposed on the parent, guardian, or other person by reason of such minor operating a motor vehicle.

(b) The insurance coverage carried by the community college district, with respect to the use of motor vehicles in connection with such courses, specifically including any limitations of such coverage which limit such coverage to an amount less than the liability imposed on the parent, guardian, or other person, or which limit the nature of such coverage to exclude any activity or situation included within the liability so imposed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Corrupt Practices [72530. - 72533.]

72530.

(a) The offering of any valuable thing to any member of the governing board of any community college district, with the intent to influence his or her action in regard to the granting of any instructor’s certificate, the appointment of any instructor, superintendent, or other officer or employee, the adoption of any textbook, or the making of any contract to which the board of which he or she is a member is a party, or the acceptance by any member of the governing board of any valuable thing, with corrupt intent, is a misdemeanor.

(b) Any contract or appointment obtained from the governing board of any community college district by corrupt means is void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 348.)
-------------------------------------------

72533.

The prohibitions contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) and Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1125) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code are applicable to members of governing boards of community college districts and to members of citizens’ oversight committees appointed by those governing boards pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) of Part 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [72620. - 72701.]



  ARTICLE 2. Counseling Services [72620. - 72621.]

72620.

The governing board of a community college district may provide in each college within the district an organized and functioning counseling program. Counseling shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Educational counseling in which the student is assisted in planning and implementing his or her immediate and long-range educational program.

(b) Career counseling in which the student is assisted in assessing his or her aptitudes, abilities, and interests in order to make realistic career decisions. The career counseling shall include encouraging students, including women and minorities, to seek apprenticeship training.

(c) Personal counseling in which the student is helped to develop his or her ability to function with social and personal responsibility.

(d) Evaluating and interpreting test data.

(e) Counseling and consultation with parents and staff members on learning problems and guidance programs for students.

For purposes of this section, a person performing counseling services to students shall be qualified as a counselor pursuant to Section 87355 or 87356.

A governing board of a community college district, which offers these counseling services, may contract with the governing boards of any other districts, or private schools, or other public and private agencies or organizations, to render the counseling services. In so contracting, the governing board of a community college district shall not contract at less than cost to a private school, or private agency or organization.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting persons participating in an organized advisory program approved by the governing board of a community college district, and supervised by a district counselor, from advising students pursuant to the organized advisory program.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any person who is performing these counseling services pursuant to law authorizing the performance thereof in effect before March 4, 1972, shall be authorized to continue to perform such services on and after March 4, 1972, without compliance with the additional requirements imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

72620.5.

Commencing with the 1997–98 fiscal year, community college districts, to the extent that funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, may provide counseling and matriculation services for students enrolled in credit courses and students enrolled in noncredit courses, according to a welfare-to-work plan as provided in Section 11325.21 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 16.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

72621.

Any information of a personal nature disclosed by a student 12 years of age or older in the process of receiving counseling from a school counselor as specified in Section 72620 is confidential. Any information of a personal nature disclosed to a school counselor by a parent or guardian of a student who is 12 years of age or older and who is in the process of receiving counseling from a school counselor as specified in Section 72620 is confidential. The information shall not become part of the student record, as defined in Section 76210, without the written consent of the person who disclosed the confidential information. The information shall not be revealed, released, discussed, or referred to, except as follows:

(a) Discussion with psychotherapists as defined by Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, other health care providers, or the college nurse, for the sole purpose of referring the student for treatment.

(b) Reporting of child abuse or neglect as required by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11165) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Reporting information to the chief administrative officer or parents of the student when the school counselor has reasonable cause to believe that disclosure is necessary to avert a clear and present danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the student or the following other persons living in the school community: administrators, teachers, school staff, parents, students, and other school community members.

(d) Reporting information to the chief administrative officer, other persons inside the college, as necessary, the parents of the student, and other persons outside the school when the student indicates that a crime, involving the likelihood of personal injury or significant or substantial property losses, will or has been committed.

(e) Reporting information to one or more persons specified in a written waiver after this written waiver of confidence is read and signed by the student and preserved in the student’s file.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a school counselor shall not disclose information deemed to be confidential pursuant to this section to the parents of the student when the school counselor has reasonable cause to believe that the disclosure would result in a clear and present danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the student.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a school counselor shall disclose information deemed to be confidential pursuant to this section to law enforcement agencies when ordered to do so by order of a court of law, to aid in the investigation of a crime, or when ordered to testify in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit access to pupil records as provided in Section 76243.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the counselor from conferring with other staff members, as appropriate, regarding modification of the student’s academic program.

It is the intent of the Legislature that counselors use the privilege of confidentiality under this section to assist the pupil whenever possible to communicate more effectively with parents, staff members, and others.

No person required by this section to keep information discussed during counseling confidential shall incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of keeping that information confidential.

As used in this section, “information of a personal nature” does not include routine objective information related to academic and career counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1152, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Auxiliary Organizations [72670. - 72682.]

72670.

The governing board of a community college district may establish auxiliary organizations for the purpose of providing supportive services and specialized programs for the general benefit of its college or colleges. As used in this article, “auxiliary organization” may include, but is not limited to, the following entities:

(a) Any entity in which any official of a community college district participates as a director as part of his or her official position.

(b) Any entity formed or operating pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 76060) of Chapter 1 of Part 47.

(c) Any entity which operates a commercial service for the benefit of a community college or district on a campus or other property of the district.

(d) Any entity whose governing instrument provides in substance both of the following:

(1) Its purpose is to promote or assist a community college or district, or to receive gifts, property and funds to be used for the benefit of the community college or district or any person or organization having an official relationship therewith.

(2) Any of its directors, governors, or trustees are either appointed or nominated by, or subject to, the approval of the governing board of the district, an official of the district, or selected, ex officio, from the membership of the student body or the faculty or the governing board or the administrative staff of the district.

(e) Any entity which is designated as an auxiliary organization by the district governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

72670.5.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may establish auxiliary organizations for the purpose of providing supportive services and specialized programs for the general benefit of the mission of the California Community Colleges.

(b) As used in this article:

(1) “Auxiliary organization” may include, but is not limited to, the following entities:

(A) Any entity whose governing instrument provides in substance both of the following:

(i) That its purpose is to promote or assist the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or to receive gifts, property, and funds to be used for the benefit of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or any person or organization having an official relationship therewith.

(ii) That any of its directors, governors, or trustees are either appointed or nominated by, or subject to, the approval of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or an official of the California Community Colleges, or selected, ex officio, from the membership of the Board of Governors or the administrative staff of the California Community Colleges.

(B) Any entity which, exclusive of the foregoing subdivisions of this section, is designated as an auxiliary organization by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “District governing board” includes the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, unless the context requires otherwise.

(c) Any agreement between the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and an auxiliary organization established pursuant to this section shall provide for full reimbursement from the auxiliary organization to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for any services performed by the employees of the board under the direction of, or on behalf of, the auxiliary organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 954, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

72671.

An auxiliary organization may enter into a joint powers agreement with any federal, state, or local governmental entity pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72672.

(a) A certified public accountant shall be selected by each auxiliary organization described in Section 72670. Upon being notified of the certified public accountant selected by an auxiliary organization, the district shall forward the applicable auditing and reporting procedures to the selected certified public accountant. In accordance with procedures prescribed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, such certified public accountant shall annually audit any and all community college auxiliary funds. The auxiliary organizations shall contract for and receive such audit annually, and shall submit such audit to the district governing board and to the board of governors. Auxiliary organizations shall annually publish an audited statement of their financial condition which shall be disseminated as widely as feasible and be available to any person on request. When an auxiliary organization primarily serves a single community college of the district, publication in the campus student newspaper shall be deemed compliance with this requirement. When an auxiliary organization serves the district governing board, distribution of the published audited statement of its financial condition at a regularly scheduled meeting of the district governing board shall be deemed compliance with this requirement.

(b) When an auxiliary organization primarily serves a single community college of the district, the president of that community college, and when an auxiliary organization primarily serves a district, the superintendent of the district, shall be responsible for ascertaining that all expenditures are in accordance with policies of the district governing board, the propriety of all expenditures, and the integrity of the financial reporting made by auxiliary organization.

(c) The purposes and operations of an auxiliary organization shall be conducted in conformity with general regulations established by the board of governors and with implementing regulations which shall be established by each district governing board prior to the establishment of an auxiliary organization. The implementing regulations established by a district shall be submitted to, and approved by, the chancellor’s office prior to the recognition of an auxiliary organization by that district. At such time as a district may recognize an auxiliary organization, it shall submit a copy of the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or other governing instruments of the auxiliary organization to the chancellor’s office. The accounting procedures of such auxiliary organizations shall be comparable to those that govern the auxiliary organizations established under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 89900) of Part 55. The regulations shall include provisions requiring the governing board of each auxiliary organization to provide salaries, working conditions and benefits for the full-time employees of each auxiliary organization which are comparable to those provided district employees performing similar services; provided, however, that the regulations may permit retirement benefits, or permanent status benefits, or both, to be withheld from temporary and executive employees of each auxiliary organization. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “temporary employee” is (1) an employee employed for a research project, workshop, institute, or other special project funded by any grant, contract, or gift; or (2) an employee whose contract of employment is for a fixed term not exceeding three years. For the purposes of this subdivision, an “executive employee” is any management employee with responsibility for the development and execution of auxiliary organization policy and includes, but is not limited to, general managers, business managers, directors, and similar positions. For those full-time employees whose duties are not comparable to classes in the district, the salaries established shall be at least equal to the salaries prevailing in other educational institutions in the area or commercial operations of like nature.

(d) Retirement benefits may be provided by other than the Public Employees’ Retirement System. A contract for participation in the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with the terms and conditions of the public employees’ retirement law shall be deemed to satisfy fully the requirements of subdivision (c) with respect to retirement.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the regulations established by the district governing board may exempt the board of directors of any newly created auxiliary organization from the requirement of providing retirement benefits for a period not to exceed three years from the date that the auxiliary organization is established.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72673.

Student body organizations not formed or operating pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 76060) of Chapter 1 of Part 47; student or faculty societies, social clubs, fraternities, and sororities; and alumni associations shall be exempt from the provisions of this article, unless any such organization, society, club, fraternity, sorority, or association has been established as an auxiliary organization pursuant to the provisions of this article.

This section shall not be construed to alter or limit the powers of the district governing board to establish rules and regulations governing organizations which maintain an official relationship with a college or district or which uses the name or facilities of the college or district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

72674.

Each auxiliary organization formed pursuant to this article, shall have a board of directors composed, both as to size and categories of membership, in accordance with regulations established by the district governing board.

Each board of directors shall, during each fiscal year, hold at least one business meeting each quarter. The board of directors shall have the benefit of the advice and counsel of at least one attorney admitted to practice law in this state and at least one licensed certified public accountant. Neither the attorney at law nor the certified public accountant need be members of the board of directors.

No auxiliary organization shall accept any grant, contract, bequest, trust, or gift, unless it is so conditioned that it may be used only for purposes consistent with policies of the district governing board.

Each board of directors of an auxiliary organization shall conduct its business in public meetings in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72675.

(a) The board of directors of an auxiliary organization shall approve all expenditures and fund appropriations. Appropriations of funds for use outside of the normal business operations of the auxiliary organization shall be approved in accordance with district policy and regulations by an officer designated by the district governing board.

(b) The district governing board, in accordance with regulations of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, shall do all of the following:

(1) Institute a standard systemwide accounting and reporting system for businesslike management of the operation of these auxiliary organizations.

(2) Implement financial standards that will ensure the fiscal viability of these various auxiliary organizations. The standards shall include proper provision for professional management, adequate working capital, adequate reserve funds for current operations and capital replacements, and adequate provisions for new business requirements.

(3) Institute procedures to ensure that transactions of the auxiliary organizations are within the educational mission of the district.

(4) Develop policies for the appropriation of funds derived from indirect cost payments not required to implement paragraph (2). Uses of these funds shall be regularly reported to the district governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 6.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

72676.

Operations of commercial services on a campus, such as a food service or bookstore, or such commercial services as may be provided in a student union, shall, when operated by an auxiliary organization, be self-supporting.

Any surplus funds from commercial operations shall be used for such purposes as are consistent with regulations of the district governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72677.

No member of the board of directors of an auxiliary organization shall be financially interested in any contract or other transaction entered into by the board of which he or she is a member. Any contract or transaction entered into in violation of this section is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72678.

No contract or other transaction entered into by the board of directors of an auxiliary organization is void under the provisions of Section 72677; nor shall any member of such board be disqualified or deemed guilty of misconduct in office under such provisions, if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The fact of such financial interest is disclosed or known to the board of directors and noted in the minutes, and the board thereafter authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a vote sufficient for the purpose without counting the vote or votes of such financially interested member or members.

(b) The contract or transaction is just and reasonable as to the auxiliary organization at the time it is authorized or approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72679.

The provisions of Section 72678 shall not be applicable if any of the following conditions are met:

(a) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a member of the board of directors of that auxiliary organization.

(b) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a partnership or unincorporated association of which any member of the governing board of that auxiliary organization is a partner or in which he or she is the owner or holder, directly or indirectly, of a proprietorship interest.
